Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3174.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a special commission governed by section 2A of chapter 4 of
the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, to assess and recommend updates to
the school bus safety standards set forth in section 7B of chapter 90 of the General Laws, and the
licensing and training requirements for school bus operators as set forth in section 8A of said
chapter. The commission shall consider whether such updates should include, but not be limited
to, the incorporation of safety sensors, additional school bus monitors, enhanced operator
training, and other equipment or operational standards necessary to ensure the safety of students,
while on the bus and during boarding, disembarking, and waiting at bus stops.
The commission shall file its findings and recommendations, together with drafts of
legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, with the clerks of the senate
and the house of representatives, the chairs of the senate and house committees on public service
and the chairs of the joint commission on education not later than December 1, 2026.
of 2

The commission shall consist of 1 member who shall be appointed by the senate
president, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader
of the senate; 1 member who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; the commissioner of the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education or a designee; the commissioner of the Department of Public Health or a designee; 1
member to be appointed by each of the following organizations: Massachusetts Association of
School Superintendents, Massachusetts School Bus Contractors Association, Massachusetts
Association of Pupil Transportation, Massachusetts Teachers Association, Massachusetts Parent
Teacher Association.
SECTION 2. This act shall be known as “Summers Law”.
of 2